Hawaii statutes.
§436B-10 Application and requirements for
licensure. (a) Application for a license shall be made on an application
form to be furnished by the licensing authority. An applicant shall provide
the following information on the application form:

(1) The applicant's legal name;

(2) Affirmation that the applicant is beyond the age
of majority;

(3) The applicant's current residence, business and
mailing addresses, and phone numbers;

(4) The applicant's social security number if the
licensing authority is authorized by federal law to require the disclosure;

(5) The date and place of any conviction of a penal
crime directly related to the profession or vocation in which the applicant is
applying for licensure, unless the conviction has been expunged or annulled, or
is otherwise precluded from consideration by section 831-3.1;

(6) Proof that the applicant is a United States
citizen, a United States national, or an alien authorized to work in the United
States;

(7) Disclosure of similar licensure in any state or
territory;

(8) Disclosure of disciplinary action by any state or
territory against any license held by the applicant; and

(9) Any other information the licensing authority may
require to investigate the applicant's qualifications for licensure.

Failure to provide the above information and pay the
required fees shall be grounds to deny the application for licensure.

(b) In addition to any other requirements
provided by law, all applicants shall be:

(1) Beyond the age of majority; and

(2) A United States citizen, a United States
national, or an alien authorized to work in the United States. [L 1991, c 111,
pt of §2; am L 1992, c 202, §12; am L 1994, c 124, §1; am L 1995, c 35, §2; am
L 1997, c 40, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next